New York, session 2025-2026, S10569.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3 of chapter 451 of the laws of 2012 amending the 2 labor law relating to permitted deductions from wages, as amended by 3 chapter 142 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 4 § 3. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 5 have become a law and shall expire and be deemed repealed [14] 16 years 6 after such effective date. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04112-01-5